fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à vent > Accessoires pour harmonicas > Supports pour harmonicas: Porte-cou; Supports de stand
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per legni > Accessori per armonica > Porta armonica: Supporti per collo; Supporti per posizione eretta
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til treblåseinstrumenter > Munnspilltilbehør > Munnspillholdere: Nakkeholdere; Stativholdere
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Træblæserinstrumenter – tilbehør > Harmonika – tilbehør > Harmonika – holdere: Halsholdere; Stativholdere
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для деревянных духовых инструментов > Аксессуары для губных гармоник > Держатели для губных гармоник: Держатели на шею; Держатели на стойку
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de madeira > Acessórios para gaita > Suportes para gaita: Suportes para pescoço; Suportes de apoio
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till träblåsinstrument > Munspelstillbehör > Munspelshållare: Halshållare; Stativhållare
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Puupuhallintarvikkeet > Huuliharpputarvikkeet > Huuliharpputelineet: Niskatelineet; Telinepidikkeet
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за дървени духови инструменти > Аксесоари за хармоника > Поставки за хармоника: Поставки за хармоника за врата; Държачи за стойки
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Fafúvóshangszer-kiegészítők > Harmonikakiegészítők > Harmonikatartók: Nyaktartók; Állványtartók
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de viento-madera > Accesorios para armónica > Soportes para armónica: Apoyos para el cuello; Soportes de apoyo
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Medinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai > Lūpinių armonikėlių priedai > Lūpinių armonikėlių stovai: Kaklo laikikliai; Stovai
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de madeiras > Acessórios para harmónica > Suportes para harmónica: Suportes para pescoço; Suportes de pé
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 木管楽器用品 > ハーモニカ用品 > ハーモニカホルダー: ネックホルダー; スタンドホルダー
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych drewnianych > Akcesoria do harmonijek > Uchwyty na harmonijki: Uchwyty na szyję; Stojak z uchwytem
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre drevené dychové nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre harmoniku > Držiaky na harmoniku: Držiaky na krk; Stojanové držiaky
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za lesna pihala > Dodatki za harmonike > Nosilci za harmonike: Držala za okoli vratu; Stoječa držala
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente de suflat > Accesorii pentru armonică > Suporturi pentru armonică: Suporturi pentru gât; Stative
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Mızıka Aksesuarları > Mızıka Tutucular: Boyundan Tutucular; Stand Tutucuları
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor houten blaasinstrumenten > Harmonica-accessoires > Harmonicahouders: Nekhouders; Standaardhouders
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za drvena puhačka glazbala > Pribor za usnu harmoniku > Držači za usnu harmoniku: Držači oko vrata za harmoniku; Stalci
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Holzblasinstrumente > Mundharmonikazubehör > Mundharmonikahalter: Nackenhalter; Standhalter
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Dřevěné dechové nástroje – příslušenství > Harmoniky – příslušenství > Držáky na foukací harmoniky: Držáky na krk; Stojanové držáky
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện cho nhạc cụ hơi > Phụ kiện kèn acmônica > Dây đeo kèn ac-mô-ni-ca: Dây đeo cổ cho kèn; Giá đỡ kèn
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 목관악기 부대용품 > 하모니카 부대용품 > 하모니카 홀더: 넥 홀더; 스탠드 홀더
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 木管乐器配件 > 口琴配件 > 口琴支架: 挂脖支架; 站立式支架
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ ξύλινων πνευστών οργάνων > Αξεσουάρ φυσαρμόνικας > Βάσεις φυσαρμόνικας: Βάσεις λαιμού; Βάσεις στήριξης
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่า > อุปกรณ์หีบเพลงเป่า > ที่ตั้งหีบเพลงเป่า: ที่วางคอ; ที่วางขาตั้ง
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Woodwind Instrument Accessories > Harmonica Accessories > Harmonica Holders: Neck Holders; Stand Holders
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 木管樂器配件 > 口琴配件 > 口琴架: 口琴固定架; 口琴立架